New York, session 2025-2026, S6600.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The multiple dwelling law is amended by adding a new 2 section 140-a to read as follows: 3 § 140-a. Inspection and compliance. 1. a. Every non-fireproof multiple 4 dwelling in a city having a population of one million or more shall be 5 inspected every three years for compliance with the fire safety stand- 6 ards set forth in the New York city housing maintenance code and the New 7 York city construction codes. 8 b. It shall be the duty of every person, firm or corporation acting 9 either as owner, agent, contractor or lessee of such multiple dwellings 10 to conduct such fire safety inspections which shall include but not be 11 limited to electrical wiring, circuits, outlets, switches, cords, and 12 related equipment. Such inspections shall be conducted by an inspector 13 certified by an entity approved by the New York city department of 14 buildings. 15 c. Every person, firm or corporation acting either as owner, agent, 16 contractor or lessee of such multiple dwelling shall submit a fire safe- 17 ty inspection report for each building owned or operated by such person, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11125-04-5 S. 6600--B 2 1 firm or corporation to the department of buildings or other appropriate 2 local agency every three years. 3 2. Fire safety inspection reports shall include: 4 a. the number and nature of the fire safety hazards found during fire 5 safety inspections; and 6 b. a description of the mitigation or repairs made in response to such 7 fire safety inspection, including the number of repairs or improvements 8 made. 9 3. Failure to submit a report by September first of the third year in 10 the three-year cycle shall result in a fine of one hundred dollars per 11 day until the report has been submitted. 12 4. Those dwellings not in compliance with such fire safety standards 13 shall have six months from such inspection to make repairs or improve- 14 ments necessary to comply with such standards. 15 5. An owner, agent, contractor or lessee may contact the appropriate 16 agency to assist with fire safety inspections should the owner, agent, 17 contractor or lessee believe an area may be too dangerous to inspect 18 without agency assistance. 19 6. Owners of multiple dwellings in a city having a population of one 20 million or more who fail to make repairs or improvements necessary for 21 compliance with the New York city housing maintenance code and the New 22 York city construction codes shall be subject to a fine of one hundred 23 dollars per day until the dwelling complies with such code. Any dwelling 24 that remains non-compliant with such code for a period of six months or 25 more shall cause a lien to be placed upon such dwelling until all 26 repairs or improvements are complete and rents are adjusted based on 27 rent abatements, due to the unsafe conditions originating from the 28 owners' non-compliance. 29 7. The New York city department of buildings shall promulgate rules 30 and regulations as necessary to effectuate these requirements. 31 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.